California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) The Secretary of State shall issue a cease and desist order to a person subject to this chapter’s provisions who has failed to comply with the provisions governing the filing and maintenance of bonds or who does not satisfactorily pass a background check required by Section 22441.1, and shall give notice of the person’s noncompliance or failure to satisfactorily pass the background check to the Attorney General. Prior to issuing a cease and desist order to a person pursuant to this subdivision, the Secretary of State shall provide the person with notice and an opportunity to demonstrate that grounds do not exist for disqualification.

(b) For orders issued for failure to comply with the provisions governing the filing and maintenance of bonds, the order shall include a statement that notice of the person’s noncompliance shall be sent to the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 605, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22443.3.

It is unlawful for any person to disseminate by any means any statement indicating directly or by implication that the person engages in the business or acts in the capacity of an immigration consultant, or proposes to engage in the business or act in the capacity of an immigration consultant, unless the person has on file with the Secretary of State a disclosure statement and a bond, in the amount of, and subject to the terms described in, Section 22443.1, that is maintained throughout the period covered by the statement, such as, but not limited to, the period of a Yellow Pages listing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 605, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22444.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant to do any of the following acts:

(a) Make false or misleading statements to a client while providing services to that client.

(b) Make any guarantee or promise to a client, unless the guarantee or promise is in writing and the immigration consultant has some basis in fact for making the guarantee or promise.

(c) Make any statement that the immigration consultant can or will obtain special favors from or has special influence with the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, or any other governmental agency, employee, or official, that may have a bearing on a client’s immigration matter.

(d) Charge a client a fee for referral of the client to another for services which the immigration consultant cannot or will not provide to the client. A sign setting forth this prohibition shall be conspicuously displayed in the immigration consultant’s office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 557, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22445.

(a) (1) A person who violates this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation, to be assessed and collected in a civil action brought by any person injured by the violation or in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney. An action brought in the name of the people of the State of California shall not preclude an action being brought by an injured person.

(2) The court shall impose a civil penalty for each violation of this chapter. In assessing the amount of the civil penalty, the court may consider relevant circumstances presented by the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the following: the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(3) Any action brought pursuant to this section by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney shall also seek relief under subdivision (c) of Section 22446.5.

(4) If the Attorney General brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If a district attorney brings the action, the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If a city attorney brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(b) In addition to the provisions of subdivision (a), a violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), as to each client with respect to whom a violation occurs, or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both fine and imprisonment. However, payment of restitution to a client shall take precedence over payment of a fine.

(c) A second or subsequent violation of Sections 22442.2, 22442.3, and 22442.4 is a misdemeanor subject to the penalties specified in subdivisions (a) and (b). A second or subsequent violation of any other provision of this chapter is a felony punishable by imprisonment in state prison.

(d) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within four years after discovery of the commission of the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 605, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22446.5.

(a) A person claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of this chapter by an immigration consultant may bring a civil action for injunctive relief or damages, or both. If the court finds that the defendant has violated a provision of this chapter, it shall award actual damages, plus an amount equal to treble the amount of actual damages or one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, whichever is greater. The court shall also grant a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

(b) Any other party who, upon information and belief, claims a violation of this chapter has been committed by an immigration consultant may bring a civil action for injunctive relief on behalf of the general public and, upon prevailing, shall recover reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

(c) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney who claims a violation of this chapter has been committed by an immigration consultant, may bring a civil action for injunctive relief, restitution, and other equitable relief against the immigration consultant in the name of the people of the State of California.

(d) An action brought under this chapter shall be set for trial at the earliest possible date, and shall take precedence over all other cases, except older matters of the same character and matters to which special preference may be given by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22447.

(a) A person who is awarded damages in an action or proceeding for injuries caused by the acts of a person engaged in the business of, or acting in the capacity of, an immigration consultant, in the performance of his or her duties as an immigration consultant, may recover damages from the bond required by Section 22443.1. In an action brought by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney, the court may order relief for benefit of the injured parties to be paid from the bond.

(b) When any claim or claims against a bond have been paid so as to reduce the principal amount of the bond remaining available to pay claims below the principal amount required by Section 22443.1, the immigration consultant shall cease to conduct any business unless and until the bond has been reinstated up to the minimum amount required by Section 22443.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22448.

Any civil action to enforce any cause of action pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action has accrued. The cause of action is not to be deemed to have accrued until the discovery, by the aggrieved party, of the facts constituting the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22449.

(a) Immigration consultants, attorneys, notaries public, and organizations accredited by the United States Board of Immigration Appeals shall be the only individuals authorized to charge clients or prospective clients fees for providing consultations, legal advice, or notary public services, respectively, associated with filing an application under the federal Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program announced by the United States Secretary of Homeland Security on June 15, 2012.

(b) (1) Immigration consultants, attorneys, notaries public, and organizations accredited by the United States Board of Immigration Appeals shall be prohibited from participating in practices that
 amount to price gouging when a client or prospective client solicits services associated with filing an application for deferred action for childhood arrivals as described in subdivision (a).

(2) For the purposes of this section, “price gouging” means any practice that has the effect of pressuring the client or prospective client to purchase services immediately because purchasing them at a later time will result in the client or prospective client paying a higher price for the same services.

(c) (1) In addition to the civil and criminal penalties described in Section 22445, a violation of this section by an attorney shall be cause for discipline by the State Bar pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3.

(2) In addition to the civil and criminal penalties described in
 Section 22445, a violation of this section by a notary public shall be cause for the revocation or suspension of his or her commission as a notary public by the Secretary of State and the application of any other applicable penalties pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8200) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 571, Sec. 1.   (AB 35)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20. Professional Photocopiers [22450. - 22463.]

22450.

A professional photocopier is any person who for compensation obtains or reproduces documents authorized to be produced under Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of, the Civil Code, or Section 1158 of, or Article 4 (commencing with Section 1560) of Chapter 2 of Division 11 of, the Evidence Code and who, while engaged in performing that activity, has access to the information contained therein. A professional photocopier shall be registered pursuant to this chapter by the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides or has his or her principal place of business, and in which he or she maintains a branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22451.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any government employee who is acting in the course of his or her employment.

(b) A member of the State Bar or his or her employees, agents, or independent contractors.

(c) Any person who is specially appointed by the court to obtain or reproduce in order to transmit or distribute those records.

(d) An employee or agent of a person who is registered under this chapter.

(e) Any custodian of records who makes his or her own copies.

(f) Any certified shorthand reporter, official court reporter, or stenotype operator who makes his or her own copies.

(g) Any person licensed under Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or his or her employees.

(h) The Office of the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22452.

(a) The application for registration of a natural person shall contain all of the following statements about the applicant certified to be true:

(1) Name, age, address, email address, and telephone number.

(2) They have not been convicted of a felony.

(3) They will perform their duties as a professional photocopier in compliance with the provisions of law governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information in this state.

(b) The application for registration of a partnership or corporation
 shall contain all of the following statements about each general partner or corporate officer, and be certified to be true:

(1) The names, ages, addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers of the general partners or officers.

(2) The general partners or officers have not been convicted of a felony.

(3) The partnership or corporation will perform its duties as a
 professional photocopier in compliance with the provisions of law governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information in this state.

(c) The county clerk shall retain the application for registration for a period of three years following the expiration date of the application, after which time the application may be destroyed if it is scanned or if the conditions specified in Section 26205.1 of the Government Code are met. If the application is scanned, the scanned image shall be retained for a period of 10 years, after which time that image may be destroyed and, notwithstanding Section 26205.1 of the Government Code, no reproduction thereof need be made or preserved.

(d) A person or entity that knowingly provides false information shall be
 subject to a civil penalty for each violation in the minimum amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and the
 maximum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). An action for a civil penalty under this provision may be brought by any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California and the penalty imposed shall be enforceable as a civil judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 36.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22453.

An applicant shall pay a fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) to the county clerk at the time he or she files an application for registration. An additional fee for each card in an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory costs associated with the issuance of additional cards, as determined by the county clerk, shall be paid to the county clerk for each additional card of identification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.   (AB 214)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

22453.1.

Notwithstanding Section 22453, any person registered pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) instead of the fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) otherwise required by Section 22453.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

22454.

(a) At least one person involved in the management of a professional photocopier shall be required to hold a current commission from the Secretary of State as a notary public in this state. If the notary commission is held by someone other than the registrant, written confirmation from the notary authorizing the use of their commission for this registration is required.

(b) The professional photocopier shall maintain a valid notary commission during the entire period that the professional photocopier’s certificate of registration is effective. The registrant shall notify the county clerk and provide an updated valid notary commission if the commission expires prior to the expiration of the certificate of
 registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 21.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22455.

(a) A certificate of registration shall be accompanied by a bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) which is executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all laws governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information under the code sections specified in Section 22450. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bond may be terminated pursuant to the provisions of Section 995.440 and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(1) The county clerk shall, upon filing the bond, deliver the bond forthwith to the county recorder for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code shall be paid by the registered professional photocopier. The fee may be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the recorder.

(2) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is seven dollars ($7).

(3) The county recorder shall record the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond, and shall thereafter mail the instrument, unless specified to the contrary, to the person named in the instrument and, if no person is named, to the party leaving it for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code for the notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond shall be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the county recorder.

(b) In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit five thousand dollars ($5,000) in cash with the county clerk.

(c) If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to the provisions of subdivision (d) and the right of a person to recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 22459.

(d) The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22456.

A certificate of registration shall be effective for a period of two years or until the date the bond expires, whichever occurs first. Thereafter, a registrant shall file a new certificate of registration or a renewal of the certificate of registration and pay the fee required by Section 22453. A certificate of registration may be renewed up to 60 days prior to its expiration date and the effective date of the renewal shall be the date the current registration expires. The renewal shall be effective for a period of two years from the effective date or until the expiration date of the bond, whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 35, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

22457.

(a) The county clerk shall maintain a register of professional photocopiers, assign a number to each professional photocopier, and issue an identification card to each one. Additional cards for employees of professional photocopiers shall be issued upon the payment of a fee for each card in an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory costs associated with the issuance of additional cards, as determined by the county clerk. Upon renewal of registration, the same number shall be assigned, provided that the applicant is renewing registration in the same county in which he or she was previously registered and there is no lapse of three or more years in the period of registration.

(b) The identification card shall be
 a card not less than three and one-quarter inches by two inches, and shall contain at the top the title, “Professional Photocopier” followed by the registrant’s name, address, registration number, date of expiration, and county of registration. It shall also contain a photograph of the registrant in the lower left corner. The identification card for a partnership or corporation registration shall be issued in the name of the partnership or corporation, and shall not contain a photograph. The identification card for an employee of a professional photocopier or a partnership or corporation shall contain a photograph of the employee in the lower left corner.

(c) The identification card for an employee of a professional photocopier or a partnership or corporation shall be issued in the name of the employee and include “Employee of: [insert name of the professional photocopier or the partnership or
 corporation].”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 295, Sec. 15.   (AB 285)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22458.

A professional photocopier shall be responsible at all times for maintaining the integrity and confidentiality of information obtained under the applicable codes in the transmittal or distribution of records to the authorized persons or entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22459.

(a) Any person who recovers damages in any action or proceeding for injuries caused by the revelation of information which was improperly obtained, transmitted, or distributed by a registrant, or caused by a registrant’s noncompliance with requirements of confidential documentary information under the code sections specified in Section 22450 may recover damages from the bond or cash deposit required by Section 22455.

(b) Whenever there has been a recovery against a bond or cash deposit under subdivision (a), the registrant shall file a new bond or deposit an additional amount of cash within 30 days to reinstate the bond or cash deposit to the amount required by Section 22455. If the registrant does not file a bond or deposit this amount within 30 days, his or her certificate of registration shall be revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22460.

The county clerk shall revoke the registration of a professional photocopier upon receipt of a court document or record stating that the registrant has been found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of this chapter, or that a civil judgment has been entered against the registrant in an action arising out of an improper disclosure or transmittal of confidential information. The county clerk shall be given notice of such court actions. A registrant whose registration is revoked pursuant to this subdivision may reapply for registration after one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22460.5.

A certificate of registration may be revoked or suspended whenever it has been determined that the registrant has transmitted or distributed records obtained under the applicable sections in a manner which does not comply with the provisions of law governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information under the code sections specified in Section 22450, or which constitutes an improper transmittal or distribution not amounting to a violation of law.

(b) An investigation concerning the revocation of certificate of registration of a registrant may be commenced at any time the public prosecutor deems it appropriate or upon the complaint of any person who has been injured by a transmittal or distribution which was handled by the registrant and does not comply with the provisions of law governing the transmittal of confidential documentary information under the code sections specified in Section 22450, or which constitutes an improper transmittal or distribution not amounting to a violation of law.

(c) If the public prosecutor determines from the investigation that cause may exist for the suspension or revocation of the certificate of registration, he or she shall set the matter for hearing and give notice to the registrant. That hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for the purposes of those provisions, the public prosecutor shall be deemed to be the agency, but shall be charged as provided by Section 11527 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22461.

A registrant whose certificate of registration is suspended or revoked shall be entitled to challenge the decision in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22462.

(a) All records transmitted or distributed by a professional photocopier shall be accompanied by a certificate containing all of the following:

(1) An affidavit signed by the custodian of the original records that were reproduced for transmittal. It shall conform to the requirements specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1560) of Chapter 2 of Division 11 of the Evidence Code.

(2) An affidavit signed by the professional photocopier or his or her employee stating that the records shall be transmitted or distributed to the authorized persons or entities.

(b) The certificate shall bear the name, address, and registration number and county of registration of the professional photocopier. The custodian of records shall be entitled to a copy of the certificate, completed as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) The custodian of records shall not be liable for the improper release of the records when the records:

(1) Were released to a professional photocopier for the production of records under authorization or subpoena or other means.

(2) Were certified pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22463.

A failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20.5. Magazine Distributors [22475. - 22475.]

22475.

(a) A magazine distributor, or any person, firm, or corporation representing a magazine distributor shall clearly and conspicuously place the subscription expiration date on all magazine renewal notices mailed to its subscribers or direct subscribers to refer to the magazine’s mailing label to find the subscription expiration date.

(b) All magazine mailing labels shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the subscription expiration date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 191, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 21. Ticket Sellers [22500. - 22511.]

22500.

(a) A ticket seller shall have a permanent business address from which tickets may only be sold and that address shall be included in any advertisement or solicitation, and shall be duly licensed as may be required by any local jurisdiction.

(b) A violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both.

(c) Any person who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in a violation of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, or a district attorney, or a city attorney of a city having a population in excess of 750,000, and, with the consent of the district attorney, by a city prosecutor in any city, county, or city and county having a full-time prosecutor in any court of competent jurisdiction. Payment of the civil penalty shall be made pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 17206. For the purposes of this section, each ticket sold or offered for sale in violation of this section shall constitute a separate violation. The remedies provided by this section are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1132, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22501.

A ticket seller shall maintain records of ticket sales, deposits, and refunds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.

A ticket seller shall, prior to sale, disclose to the purchaser by means of description or a map the location of the seat or seats represented by the ticket or tickets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.1.

It shall be unlawful for a ticket seller to contract for the sale of tickets or accept consideration for payment in full or for a deposit for the sale of tickets unless the ticket seller meets one or more of the following requirements:

(a) The ticket seller has the ticket in his or her possession.

(b) The ticket seller has a written contract to obtain the offered ticket at a certain price from a person in possession of the ticket or from a person who has a contractual right to obtain the ticket from the primary contractor.

(c) The ticket seller informs the purchaser orally at the time of the contract or receipt of consideration, whichever is earlier, and in writing within two business days, that the seller does not have possession of the tickets, has no contract to obtain the offered ticket at a certain price from a person in possession of the ticket or from a person who has a contractual right to obtain the ticket from the primary contractor, and may not be able to supply the ticket at the contracted price or range of prices.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a ticket seller from accepting a deposit from a prospective purchaser as part of an agreement that the ticket seller will make best efforts to obtain a ticket at a specified price or price range and within a specified time, provided that the ticket seller informs the purchaser orally at the time of the contract or receipt of consideration, whichever is earlier, and in writing within two days, of the terms of the deposit agreement, and includes in the oral and written notice the disclosures otherwise required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1132, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.2.

It shall be unlawful for a ticket seller to represent that he or she can deliver or cause to be delivered a ticket at a specific price or within a specific price range and to fail to deliver within a reasonable time or by a contracted time the tickets at or below the price stated or within the range of prices stated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1132, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.3.

In addition to other remedies, a ticket seller who violates Section 22502.1 or 22502.2 and fails to supply a ticket at or below a contracted price or within a contracted price range shall be civilly liable to the ticket purchaser for two times the contracted price of the ticket, in addition to any sum expended by the purchaser in nonrefundable expenses for attending or attempting to attend the event in good faith reliance on seat or space availability, and reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1132, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22503.

A ticket seller, as used in this chapter, means any person who for compensation, commission, or otherwise sells admission tickets to sporting, musical, theatre, or any other entertainment event.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22503.5.

This chapter does not apply to any primary contractor or seller of tickets for the primary contractor operating under a written contract with the primary contractor.

“Primary contractor” means the person or organization who is responsible for the event for which tickets are being sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22503.6.

This chapter does not apply to an officially appointed agent of an air carrier, ocean carrier or motor coach carrier who purchases or sells tickets in conjunction with a tour package accomplished through the primary event promoter or his or her agent by written agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22504.

This chapter does not apply to any person who sells six tickets or less to any one single event, provided the tickets are sold off the premises where the event is to take place, including, but not limited to, designated parking areas and points of entry to the event.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22505.

A violation of any provision of this chapter shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22505.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22503.5, 22503.6, 22504, or 22511, it shall be unlawful for a person to intentionally use or sell software or services to circumvent a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure that is used to ensure an equitable ticket buying process for event attendees.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) ”Event attendee” means a person who purchases one or more tickets with the intent to attend the event for which the ticket or tickets are purchased. An event attendee does not include a ticket seller.

(2) “A control or measure that is used to ensure an equitable ticket buying process” includes limits on the number of tickets that a person can purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (AB 1032)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22506.

Any partial or full deposit received by a ticket seller on a future event for which tickets are not available shall be refundable except for a service charge of not more than 10 percent until tickets for the event are actually available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22507.

(a) The ticket price of an event which is canceled shall be fully refunded to the purchaser by the ticket seller within 30 calendar days of the cancellation.

(b) The ticket price of an event which is postponed, rescheduled, or replaced with another event at the same date and time, shall be fully refunded
 to the purchaser by the ticket seller upon request within 30 calendar days of the refund request.

(c) For purposes of this section, a rescheduled event includes a canceled occurrence of a recurring event for which the purchaser is offered the opportunity to attend another, materially identical occurrence of the same event at a different date or time. 

(d) A local jurisdiction may require a ticket seller to provide a bond of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to provide for any refunds that may be required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 180, Sec. 1.   (AB 1556)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22508.

A ticket seller shall disclose that a service charge is imposed by the ticket seller and is added to the actual ticket price by the seller in any advertisement or promotion for any event by the ticket seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22509.

Any ticket seller who includes tickets to an event in conjunction with the sale of a tour or event package, including, among other things, transportation, meals, lodging, or beverages, shall disclose in any advertisements or promotional materials the price charged or allotted for the tickets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22510.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits any local agency from imposing any local fees or taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22511.

This chapter does not apply to any nonprofit charitable tax-exempt organization selling tickets to an event sponsored by the organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 21.5. Money Exchange Houses [22515. - 22519.5.]

22515.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions are applicable:

(a) “Money exchange house” means any individual or business engaged in the business of exchanging or dealing in the currency of the United States, Mexico, or any other country. It does not include any bank, savings association, or credit union chartered under the laws of this state or the United States or to any other business or entity regulated by the Financial Code.

(b) “Currency” means any coined money, banknotes, or other paper money as are authorized by law which circulates from hand to hand as the medium of exchange.

(c) “Buying dollars” means a transaction exchanging foreign currency for currency of the United States.

(d) “Selling dollars” means a transaction exchanging the currency of the United States for foreign currency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22516.

(a) All window and exterior signs concerning the rates of exchange at a money exchange house shall clearly state the rate of exchange for both the buying and selling of dollars.

(b) All interior signs and all advertising, if rates are quoted, shall clearly state the rates of exchange for both buying and selling of dollars and shall state all commissions and fees charged on all transactions.

(c) An interior sign containing all information regarding rates of exchange and fees shall be printed in English and posted in clear view of customers at each point of exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22517.

It is unlawful for a money exchange house to advertise “no commission” when, in fact, a commission or fee is charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22518.

A receipt shall be presented to each customer for each exchange, clearly stating the rate of exchange for the particular transaction, the amount of commission or fees, and the net exchange after all fees and commissions have been deducted. The receipt shall also state the total amount of currency presented by the customer and the total amount returned to the customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22519.
